apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ka/zati__vblex">
      <!-- Future forms are different between east and west -->
      <group alt="sh">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>za</l>
            <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
         <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>zat</l>
            <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
          <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>zat</l>
            <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
          <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>za</l>
            <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
         <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>za</l>
            <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
         <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>

      <e>
        <p>
         <l>zati</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ži</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žem</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žeš</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>že</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žemo</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žete</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>žu</l>
         <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="jeb/ati__vblex">
      <!-- Future forms are different between east and west -->
      <group alt="sh">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>a</l>
            <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
         <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>at</l>
            <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
          <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>at</l>
            <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
          <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>a</l>
            <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
         <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>a</l>
            <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
          </p>
         <par n="C__ću"/>
        </e>
      </group>

      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ati</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>em</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>eš</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>emo</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ete</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>u</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ah</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aše</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aše</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>asmo</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aste</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ahu</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="jebati"><i>jeb</i><par n="jeb/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sejati"><i>sej</i><par n="jeb/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kazati"><i>ka</i><par n="ka/zati__vblex"/></e>
